Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6419.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. In all respects in which the amendments to the Home Rule Charter of the city
of Woonsocket, which amendments were adopted and approved by the electors of the city of
Woonsocket on November 5, 2024, may require ratification, confirmation, validation, or enactment
by the general assembly, but in no other respects, the provisions of said amendments to the Home
Rule Charter of the city of Woonsocket are hereby ratified, confirmed, validated, and enacted. It is
the express intention of the general assembly, by the passage of this act, to give effect to, ratify,
confirm, validate, and enact those provisions of the said amendments to the Home Rule Charter of
the city of Woonsocket which require ratification, confirmation, validation, or enactment and, by
the passage of this act, the legislature does hereby ratify, confirm, validate, and enact said
provisions, but nothing in this act shall be construed to abrogate or impair the powers now or
hereafter granted to towns or cities by the home rule amendment and other applicable laws of the
state of Rhode Island or those rights retained by said city of Woonsocket in its Home Rule Charter.
SECTION 2. If any provision of this act, or the application thereof to the city of
Woonsocket or to any person or circumstances, is deemed invalid for any reason, the remainder of
this act, or the application of such provision to said town or other persons or circumstances, shall
not be affected thereby and, to this end, the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.

SECTION 3. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003052
========
LC003052 - Page 2 of 3